North Carolina statutes. Chapter 2. Clerk of Superior Court. [Repealed]
§§ 2-1 through 2-60.
[Repealed]

Repealed and transferred by Session Laws 1971, c. 363.

Editor’s Note.

G.S. 2-2, 2-5, 2-6, 2-10, 2-12, 2-13, 2-15, 2-16, 2-17, 2-19 to 2-22, 2-24, 2-25, 2-42, 2-45, 2-52 to 2-56, and 2-60 were transferred to

G.S. 7A-100

, 7A-102 to 7A-104, 7A-106, and 7A-109 to 7A-112 by Session Laws 1971, c. 363.

Session Laws 1971, c. 363, s. 11, as amended by Session Laws 1971, c. 518, s. 1, provides: “Repeal of any curative or validating laws by this section shall not be construed to invalidate any acts validated by the curative or validating laws.”